Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 139. PERSONAL INJURY TO CERTAIN PERSONS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 139.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Claimant" means a person described by Section 139.002(1) or (2) who makes a claim to which this chapter applies.

(2) "Incapacitated person" has the meaning assigned by Section 1002.017, Estates Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1228, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 22.011, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 139.002. SCOPE OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a suit on a claim for damages arising from personal injury:

(1) to an incapacitated person; or

(2) in which the personal injury has resulted in the substantial disablement of the injured person.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1228, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. STRUCTURED SETTLEMENT OFFER

Sec. 139.101. WRITTEN OFFER REQUIRED. An offer of structured settlement made after a suit to which this chapter applies has been filed must be:

(1) made in writing; and

(2) presented to the attorney for the claimant.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1228, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 139.102. PRESENTATION TO CLAIMANT. (a) As soon as practicable after receiving the offer under Section 139.101, but not later than any expiration date that may accompany the quotation that outlines the terms of the structured settlement offered, the attorney receiving the offer shall present the offer to the claimant or the claimant's personal representative.

(b) To the extent reasonably necessary to permit the claimant or the claimant's personal representative to make an informed decision regarding the acceptance or rejection of a proposed structured settlement, the attorney shall advise the claimant or the claimant's personal representative with respect to:

(1) the terms, conditions, and other attributes of the proposed structured settlement; and

(2) the appropriateness of the structured settlement under the circumstances.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1228, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.